src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-parii_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - paŗī: # adjectives 198 'eng /est sobiv/fin' - full paradigm
     paŗī+A+Sg+Nom: paŗī
     paŗī+A+Sg+Gen: paŗīz
     paŗī+A+Sg+Par: paŗīzt
     paŗī+A+Sg+Dat: paŗīzõn
     paŗī+A+Sg+Ins: paŗīzõks
     paŗī+A+Sg+Ill: paŗīzõ
     paŗī+A+Sg+Ela: paŗīzõst
     paŗī+A+Pl+Nom: paŗīzt
     paŗī+A+Pl+Gen: paŗīzt
     paŗī+A+Pl+Par: paŗŗīži
     paŗī+A+Pl+Dat: paŗīztõn
     paŗī+A+Pl+Ins: paŗīztõks
     paŗī+A+Pl+Ill: paŗīžiz
     paŗī+A+Pl+Ela: paŗīžist
